Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB544.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Contract" means the service agreement between a retail electric supplier
and a customer that owns or operates a data center;
(b) "Contract capacity" means the mutually agreed amount of monthly peak
load requirements for each month during the remaining term of the
contract after the load ramp period has expired;
(c) "Data center" means:
1. A qualified data center project that has been approved for a certificate
of exemption under KRS 139.499; or
2. A centralized facility that:
a. Is used primarily or exclusively for electronic information
services, including but not limited to the mining of
cryptocurrency and the management, storage, processing, and
dissemination of electronic data and information through the
use of computer systems, servers, networking equipment, and
related components; and
b. Has electrical load that is either fixed, portable, or distributable,
including but not limited to structures that are not affixed to the
ground or are easily removed from a location;
(d) "Data center customer" means a customer of a retail electric supplier that
owns or operates, or proposes to own or operate, a data center or who is
otherwise responsible for paying for electric service for a data center;
(e) "Existing load" means data center electrical load for which a letter of
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 938
agreement or electric service agreement was signed prior to the effective
date of this Act;
(f) "Load ramp period" means the time of commencement of electric service
until the customer reaches full contract capacity;
(g) "New load" means data center electrical load for which a letter of
agreement or electric service agreement was not signed prior to the effective
date of this Act; and
(h) "Total aggregated customer contract capacity" means all new loads of fifty
(50) megawatts or more for affiliated companies and companies with
common ownership of a data center that are in the same service territory of
the data center.
(2) A retail electric supplier shall not provide service to a data center customer that
has a total aggregated customer contract capacity of greater than one hundred
(100) megawatts unless it has filed, and the commission has approved, a tariff or
contract with minimum data center service requirements, including but not
limited to requirements relating to:
(a) Minimum contract durations;
(b) Early contract termination fees;
(c) Load ramp period terms; and
(d) The provision of financial assurances by data center customers.
(3) The requirements of this section shall not apply to a data center customer with
existing load above one hundred (100) megawatts that has already signed a letter
of agreement or electric service agreement prior to the effective date of this Act.
However, a data center customer with exempt existing load that expands by more
than one hundred (100) megawatts above the contracted capacity under its
existing or a new electric service agreement following the effective date of this
Act shall be subject to the requirements of this section with regard to the
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 938
expansion.
(4) The commission shall not approve a tariff filed pursuant to this section unless the
record of the proceeding at which the tariff is considered demonstrates that:
(a) All capital and operating costs for new generation, transmission, or
distribution facilities built to serve the data center exclusively are assigned
to the data center customer on an incremental cost basis;
(b) Any costs for new facilities that provide a shared benefit to other customer
classes are allocated proportionally, to ensure that the data center customer
pays its average embedded cost share, plus any additional incremental costs
necessary to meet the specific reliability or capacity needs of the data center
load; and
(c) Any allocation of shared data center costs to other customer classes does
not result in any greater adverse impact on the rates or service for those
other customer classes than would have existed had the data center not
connected to the system.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Ratepayer Protection Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/3/2026 9:05 AM Jacketed